Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 4. Relations of Members to Each Other and to the Limited Liability Company

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-29-401.
Becoming a member.

If a limited liability company is to have only one (1) member upon formation, the person becomes a member as determined by that person and the organizer of the company. That person and the organizer may be, but need not be, different persons. If different, the organizer acts on behalf of the initial member.

If a limited liability company is to have more than one (1) member upon formation, those persons become members as agreed by them. The organizer acts on behalf of the persons in forming the company and may be, but need not be, one of the persons.

Reserved.

After formation of a limited liability company, a person becomes a member:

As provided in the operating agreement;

As the result of a transaction effective under article 10 of this chapter;

With the consent of all the members; or

If, within ninety (90) consecutive days after the company ceases to have any members:

The last person to have been a member, or the legal representative of that person, designates a person to become a member; and

The designated person consents to become a member.

A person may become a member without acquiring a transferable interest and without making or being obligated to make a contribution to the limited liability company.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

Applied in

GreenHunter Energy, Inc. v. W. Ecosystems Tech., Inc., 2014 WY 144,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Nov. 7, 2014).

§ 17-29-402.
Form of contribution.

A contribution may consist of tangible or intangible property or other benefit to a limited liability company, including money, services performed, promissory notes, other agreements to contribute money or property and contracts for services to be performed.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

Applied in

GreenHunter Energy, Inc. v. W. Ecosystems Tech., Inc., 2014 WY 144,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Nov. 7, 2014).

§ 17-29-403.
Liability for contributions.

A person’s obligation to make a contribution to a limited liability company is not excused by the person’s death, disability or other inability to perform personally. If a person does not make a required contribution, the person or the person’s estate is obligated to contribute money equal to the value of the part of the contribution which has not been made, at the option of the company.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-404.
Sharing of and right to distributions before dissolution.

Any distributions made by a limited liability company before its dissolution and winding up shall be in equal shares among members and dissociated members, except:

To the extent otherwise provided in a written or verbal operating agreement as set forth in W.S.

17-29-110

;

To the extent necessary to comply with any transfer effective under W.S.

17-29-502

and any charging order in effect under W.S.

17-29-503

; or

To the extent otherwise represented by the company through an authorized representative in tax filings with the Internal Revenue Service in which the status elected by the company is not timely disputed by any member.

A person has a right to a distribution before the dissolution and winding up of a limited liability company only if the company decides to make an interim distribution. A person’s dissociation does not entitle the person to a distribution.

A person does not have a right to demand or receive a distribution from a limited liability company in any form other than money. Except as otherwise provided in W.S. 17-29-708(c), a limited liability company may distribute an asset in kind if each part of the asset is fungible with each other part and each person receives a percentage of the asset equal in value to the person’s share of distributions.

If a member or transferee becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the member or transferee has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited liability company with respect to the distribution.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-405.
Limitations on distribution.

A limited liability company shall not make a distribution if after the distribution:

The company would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the ordinary course of the company’s activities; or

The company’s total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities plus the amount that would be needed, if the company were to be dissolved, wound up and terminated at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights upon dissolution, winding up and termination of members whose preferential rights are superior to those of persons receiving the distribution.

A limited liability company may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection (a) of this section on financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances or on a fair valuation or other method that is reasonable under the circumstances.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this section, the effect of a distribution under subsection (a) of this section is measured:

In the case of a distribution by purchase, redemption or other acquisition of a transferable interest in the company, as of the date money or other property is transferred or debt incurred by the company; and

In all other cases, as of the date:

The distribution is authorized, if the payment occurs within one hundred twenty (120) days after that date; or

The payment is made, if the payment occurs more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the distribution is authorized.

Except as otherwise expressly agreed in writing, a limited liability company’s indebtedness to a member incurred by reason of a distribution made in accordance with this section is at parity with the company’s indebtedness to its general, unsecured creditors.

A limited liability company’s indebtedness, including indebtedness issued in connection with or as part of a distribution, is not a liability for purposes of subsection (a) of this section if the terms of the indebtedness provide that payment of principal and interest are made only to the extent that a distribution could be made to members under this section.

If indebtedness is issued as a distribution, each payment of principal or interest on the indebtedness is treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is made.

In subsection (a) of this section, “distribution” does not include amounts constituting reasonable compensation for present or past services or reasonable payments made in the ordinary course of business under a bona fide retirement plan or other benefits program.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-406.
Liability for improper distributions.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, if a member of a member-managed limited liability company or manager of a manager-managed limited liability company consents to a distribution made in violation of W.S.

17-29-405

and in consenting to the distribution fails to comply with W.S.

17-29-409

, the member or manager is personally liable to the company for the amount of the distribution that exceeds the amount that could have been distributed without the violation of W.S.

17-29-405

.

To the extent the operating agreement of a member-managed limited liability company expressly relieves a member of the authority and responsibility to consent to distributions and imposes that authority and responsibility on one (1) or more other members, the liability stated in subsection (a) of this section applies to the other members and not the member that the operating agreement relieves of authority and responsibility.

A person that receives a distribution knowing that the distribution to that person was made in violation of W.S.

17-29-405

is personally liable to the limited liability company but only to the extent that the distribution received by the person exceeded the amount that could have been properly paid under W.S.

17-29-405

.

A person against which an action is commenced because the person is liable under subsection (a) of this section may:

Implead any other person that is subject to liability under subsection (a) of this section and seek to compel contribution from the person; and

Implead any person that received a distribution in violation of subsection (c) of this section and seek to compel contribution from the person in the amount the person received in violation of subsection (c) of this section.

An action under this section is barred if not commenced within two (2) years after the distribution.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-407.
Management of limited liability company.

A limited liability company is a member-managed limited liability company unless the articles of organization or the operating agreement:

Expressly provides that:

The company is or will be “manager-managed”;

The company is or will be “managed by managers”; or

Management of the company is or will be “vested in managers”; or

Includes words of similar import.

In a member-managed limited liability company, unless the articles of organization or the operating agreement provide otherwise, the following rules apply:

The management and conduct of the company are vested in the members;

Each member has equal rights in the management and conduct of the company’s activities except:

That a member’s interest is otherwise defined in W.S. 17-29-102(a)(xxiv);

To the extent otherwise provided in any other provision in this chapter; or

To the extent otherwise represented by the company through an authorized representative in tax filings with the Internal Revenue Service in which the status elected by the company is not timely disputed by any member.

A difference arising among members as to a matter in the ordinary course of the activities of the company may be decided by a majority of the members;

An act outside the ordinary course of the activities of the company may be undertaken only with the consent of all members;

The operating agreement may be amended only with the consent of all members.

In a manager-managed limited liability company, unless the articles of organization or the operating agreement provide otherwise, the following rules apply:

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, any matter relating to the activities of the company is decided exclusively by the managers;

Each manager has equal rights in the management and conduct of the activities of the company;

A difference arising among managers as to a matter in the ordinary course of the activities of the company may be decided by a majority of the managers;

The consent of all members is required to:

Sell, lease, exchange or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of the company’s property, with or without the good will, outside the ordinary course of the company’s activities;

Approve a merger, conversion, continuance, transfer or domestication under article 10 of this chapter;

Undertake any other act outside the ordinary course of the company’s activities; and

Amend the operating agreement.

A manager may be chosen at any time by the consent of a majority of the members and remains a manager until a successor has been chosen, unless the manager at an earlier time resigns, is removed or dies, or, in the case of a manager that is not an individual, terminates. A manager may be removed at any time by the consent of a majority of the members without notice or cause;

A person need not be a member to be a manager, but the dissociation of a member that is also a manager removes the person as a manager. If a person that is both a manager and a member ceases to be a manager, that cessation does not by itself dissociate the person as a member;

A person’s ceasing to be a manager does not discharge any debt, obligation or other liability to the limited liability company or members which the person incurred while a manager.

An action requiring the consent of members under this article may be taken without a meeting, and a member may appoint a proxy or other agent to consent or otherwise act for the member by signing an appointing record, personally or by the member’s agent.

The dissolution of a limited liability company does not affect the applicability of this section. However, a person that wrongfully causes dissolution of the company loses the right to participate in management as a member and a manager.

This article does not entitle a member to remuneration for services performed for a member-managed limited liability company, except for reasonable compensation for services rendered in winding up the activities of the company.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1; 2017 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (b)(ii), added (b)(ii)(A), and added the (b)(ii)(B) and (b)(ii)(C) designations, and made related changes; in (b)(ii)(B), inserted “provided in any other provision in this chapter; or”; and (b)(ii)(C), inserted “To the extent otherwise.”

Beneficial owner.—

Management.

Beneficial owner.—

Sufficient evidence supported the jury’s finding that a wife and two children were 90 percent beneficial owners of an LLC where the LLC members possessed only the barest incidents of ownership and were to act only at the beneficiaries’ direction, and the wife’s testimony described the circumstances surrounding the transfer. Mgmt. Nominees v. Skowronska, 2019 WY 105, 450 P.3d 672,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 2019).

Management.

Limited liability
company (LLC), although technically manager-managed, was not actually
member-managed, due to the lack of an active manager, because (1)
the operating agreement said a third party was elected to act as manager,
(2) that person was not removed, nor did that person resign, and (3)
a court could not ignore the LLC's designation of itself as manager-managed. Mont. Food, LLC v. Todosijevic, 2015 WY 26, 344 P.3d 751,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 2015).

Limited liability
company (LLC) member had no authority to unilaterally adjust members'
ownership interests because (1) Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 17-29-407(c)(iv)(C) said the consent of all members was required to undertake
any act outside the ordinary course of the company's activities, unless
organizational documents provided otherwise, (2) nothing in the articles
of organization or operating agreement gave anyone the authority to
change ownership interests, and (3) changing ownership interests was
action outside the ordinary course of the LLC's activities. Mont. Food, LLC v. Todosijevic, 2015 WY 26, 344 P.3d 751,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 2015).

Applied in

GreenHunter Energy, Inc. v. W. Ecosystems Tech., Inc., 2014 WY 144,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Nov. 7, 2014).

§ 17-29-408.
Indemnification and insurance.

A limited liability company shall reimburse for any payment made and indemnify for any debt, obligation or other liability incurred by a member of a member-managed company or the manager of a manager-managed company in the course of the member’s or manager’s activities on behalf of the company, if, in making the payment or incurring the debt, obligation or other liability, the member or manager complied with the duties stated in W.S.

17-29-405

and

17-29-409

.

A limited liability company may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a member or manager of the company against liability asserted against or incurred by the member or manager in that capacity or arising from that status.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-409.
Standards of conduct for members and managers.

A member of a member-managed limited liability company owes to the company and, subject to W.S. 17-29-901(b), the other members the fiduciary duties of loyalty and care stated in subsections (b) and (c).

The duty of loyalty of a member in a member-managed limited liability company includes the duties:

To account to the company and to hold as trustee for it any property, profit or benefit derived by the member:

In the conduct or winding up of the company’s activities;

From a use by the member of the company’s property; or

From the appropriation of a limited liability company opportunity;

To refrain from dealing with the company in the conduct or winding up of the company’s activities as or on behalf of a person having an interest adverse to the company; and

To refrain from competing with the company in the conduct of the company’s activities before the dissolution of the company.

Subject to the business judgment rule, the duty of care of a member of a member-managed limited liability company in the conduct and winding up of the company’s activities is to act with the care that a person in a like position would reasonably exercise under similar circumstances and in a manner the member reasonably believes to be in the best interests or at least not opposed to the best interests of the company. In discharging this duty, a member may rely in good faith upon opinions, reports, statements or other information provided by another person that the member reasonably believes is a competent and reliable source for the information.

A member in a member-managed limited liability company or a manager-managed limited liability company shall discharge the duties under this chapter or under the operating agreement and exercise any rights consistently with the contractual obligation of good faith and fair dealing.

It is a defense to a claim under paragraph (b)(ii) of this section and any comparable claim in equity or at common law that the transaction was fair to or at least not opposed to the limited liability company.

All of the members of a member-managed limited liability company or a manager-managed limited liability company may authorize or ratify, after full disclosure of all material facts, a specific act or transaction that otherwise would violate the duty of loyalty.

In a manager-managed limited liability company, the following rules apply:

Subsections (a), (b), (c) and (e) of this section apply to the manager or managers and not the members;

The duty stated under paragraph (b)(iii) of this section continues until winding up is completed;

Subsection (d) of this section applies to the members and managers;

Subsection (f) of this section applies only to the members;

A member does not have any fiduciary duty to the company or to any other member solely by reason of being a member.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

Lack of findings. —

No breach of fiduciary duty. —

Lack of findings. —

District court erred in finding, inter alia, that a doctor breached his fiduciary duties as a manager of a limited liability company (LLC) by appropriating an opportunity and competing with the LLC in violation of his statutory duty of care and the covenant of good faith and fair dealing because the court did not make any findings on whether the LLC had an actual or expected interest in an Eye Center business, the LLC did not have a written contract with the Eye Center that gave it the exclusive rights to provide anesthesiology services, and there were questions of fact about whether the doctor competed with the LLC and whether it justifiably expected to continue receiving revenues from the Eye Center.
Stevens v. Anesthesiology Consultants of Cheyenne, LLC, 2018 WY 45, 415 P.3d 1270,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2018).

No breach of fiduciary duty. —

Manager of a limited liability company that owned apartment complexes did not breach the manager's fiduciary duty by not soliciting competitive management bids because the manager had no such statutory duty. Acorn v. Moncecchi, 2016 WY 124, 386 P.3d 739,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 2016).

Manager of a limited liability company (LLC) that owned apartment complexes did not breach the manager's fiduciary duty by contracting with an entity the manager partly owned to provide property management because (1) the evidence showed the use of this company was fair, and (2) the LLC's operating agreement permitted the manager to contract with entities in which the manager had an interest. Acorn v. Moncecchi, 2016 WY 124, 386 P.3d 739,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 2016).

Sufficient evidence supported the jury’s verdict that the physician did not breach his fiduciary duties or the covenant of good faith and fair dealing to the anesthesiology group because the jury could have reasonably found that any expectation the group may have had to avail itself of the eye surgery center’s business opportunity was dashed when the center declined to pay an additional per-case stipend and when the group amended the operational agreements to pool and distribute only that revenue group members derived from the hospital and its surgery center. Anesthesiology Consultants of Cheyenne, LLC v. Stevens, 2020 WY 67, 464 P.3d 584,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2020).

§ 17-29-410.
Right of members, managers and dissociated members to information.

In a member-managed limited liability company, the following rules apply:

On reasonable notice, a member may inspect and copy during regular business hours, at a reasonable location specified by the company, any record maintained by the company regarding the company’s activities, financial condition and other circumstances, to the extent the information is material to the member’s rights and duties under the operating agreement or this chapter;

The company shall furnish to each member:

On demand, any information concerning the company’s activities, financial condition and other circumstances which the company knows and is material to the proper exercise of the member’s rights and duties under the operating agreement or this chapter, except to the extent the company can establish that it reasonably believes the member already knows the information; and

On demand, any other information concerning the company’s activities, financial condition and other circumstances, except to the extent the demand or information demanded is unreasonable or otherwise improper under the circumstances.

The duty to furnish information under paragraph (ii) of this subsection also applies to each member to the extent the member knows any of the information described in paragraph (ii) of this subsection.

In a manager-managed limited liability company, the following rules apply:

The informational rights stated in subsection (a) of this section and the duty stated in paragraph (a)(iii) of this section apply to the managers and not the members;

During regular business hours and at a reasonable location specified by the company, a member may obtain from the company and inspect and copy full information regarding the activities, financial condition and other circumstances of the company as is just and reasonable if:

The member seeks the information for a purpose material to the member’s interest as a member;

The member makes a demand in a record received by the company, describing with reasonable particularity the information sought and the purpose for seeking the information; and

The information sought is directly connected to the member’s purpose.

Within ten (10) days after receiving a demand pursuant to subparagraph (ii)(B) of this subsection, the company shall in a record inform the member that made the demand:

Of the information that the company will provide in response to the demand and when and where the company will provide the information; and

If the company declines to provide any demanded information, the company’s reasons for declining.

Whenever this chapter or an operating agreement provides for a member to give or withhold consent to a matter, before the consent is given or withheld, the company shall, upon demand, provide the member with all information that is known to the company and is material to the member’s decision.

On ten (10) days’ demand made in a record received by a limited liability company, a dissociated member may have access to information to which the person was entitled while a member if the information pertains to the period during which the person was a member, the person seeks the information in good faith and the person satisfies the requirements imposed on a member by paragraph (b)(ii) of this section. The company shall respond to a demand made pursuant to this subsection in the manner provided in paragraph (b)(iii) of this section.

A limited liability company may charge a person that makes a demand under this section the reasonable costs of copying, limited to the costs of labor and material.

A member or dissociated member may exercise rights under this section through an agent or, in the case of an individual under legal disability, a legal representative. Any restriction or condition imposed by the operating agreement or under subsection (g) of this section applies both to the agent or legal representative and the member or dissociated member.

The rights under this section do not extend to a person as transferee.

In addition to any restriction or condition stated in its operating agreement, a limited liability company, as a matter within the ordinary course of its activities, may impose reasonable restrictions and conditions on access to and use of information to be furnished under this section, including designating information confidential and imposing nondisclosure and safeguarding obligations on the recipient. In a dispute concerning the reasonableness of a restriction under this subsection, the company has the burden of proving reasonableness.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.